Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.880

Agreements with contiguous states—Jointly occupied ports of entry—Collection of fees and taxes.

The Washington state patrol may negotiate and enter into bilateral agreements with designated representatives of contiguous states. Agreements may provide for the manning and operation of jointly occupied ports of entry, for the collection of highway user fees, registration fees, and taxes that may be required by statute or rule. Agreements may further provide for the collection of these fees and taxes by either party state at jointly occupied ports of entry before authorization is given for vehicles to legally operate within that state or jurisdiction, and for the enforcement of safety, size, and weight statutes or rules of the respective states.

[ 1988 c 21 s 1.]